Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-415
Health care service, defined.

Health care service means an adult day service, a children's day health service, a home health agency, a hospice or hospice service, a PACE center, or a respite care service. Health care service does not include an in-home personal services agency as defined in section 71-6501.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 15;

Laws 2007, LB236, § 43;

Laws 2010, LB849, § 22;

Laws 2020, LB1053, § 7.